District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.08

Authorization of appropriations.

(a)

Authorization. —

(1)

Delta Council; access to state-of-the-art educational technology; and workforce preparation initiatives. —

There are authorized to be appropriated to carry out subsections (a), (b), and (d) of § 38-1806.04, $1,000,000 for each of the fiscal years 1997, 1998, and 1999.

(2)

Deal Center. —

There are authorized to be appropriated to carry out § 38-1806.04(c), $2,000,000 for each of the fiscal years 1997, 1998, and 1999.

(3)

Jobs for D.C. Graduates Program. —

There are authorized to be appropriated to carry out § 38-1806.07:

(A)

$2,000,000 for fiscal year 1997; and

(B)

$3,000,000 for each of the fiscal years 1998 through 2001.

(b)

Availability. —

Amounts authorized to be appropriated under subsection (a) are authorized to remain available until expended.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [269], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2608

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.68.